Nevada, session 83, AB313.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 371 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Vehicles registered by a person who is a volunteer
firefighter, not to exceed the amount of $8,750 determined
valuation, are exempt from taxation, but the exemption must not
be allowed to anyone but bona fide residents of this State, and
must be filed in but one county in this State on account of that
person.
2. The person claiming the exemption must file with the
Department in the county where the exemption is claimed an
affidavit declaring his or her residency, that he or she currently
serves as a volunteer firefighter and that the exemption has been
claimed in no other county in this State for that year. The affidavit
must be made before the county assessor or a notary public. After
the filing of the original affidavit, the county assessor shall, except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, mail a form for renewal
of the exemption to the person each year following a year in which
the exemption was allowed for that person. The form must be
designed to facilitate its return by mail by the person claiming the
exemption. If so requested by the person claiming the exemption,
the county assessor may provide the form to the person by
electronic means in lieu of by mail.
3. Upon first claiming the exemption, the claimant shall
furnish to the Department:
(a) An identification card which indicates that the claimant
currently serves as a volunteer firefighter; or
(b) A letter from the chief officer of a volunteer or
combination fire department certifying the claimant as a volunteer
firefighter.
4. A person is not entitled to the exemption provided by this
section in any fiscal year beginning after the person ceases to be a
volunteer firefighter.
5. Beginning with the Fiscal Year 2027-2028, the monetary
amount in subsection 1 must be adjusted for each fiscal year by
adding to each amount the product of the amount multiplied by
the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index (All Items)
from December 2025 to the December preceding the fiscal year for
which the adjustment is calculated.
-
*AB313*

– 3 –
6. As used in this section, “volunteer firefighter” means a
person who serves actively in an unpaid capacity in a volunteer or
combination fire department within this State as a firefighter for
the benefit or safety of the public.
Sec. 2. NRS 371.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.105 Claims pursuant to NRS 371.101, 371.102, 371.103 or
371.104 or section 1 of this act for tax exemption on the
governmental services tax and designations of any amount to be
credited to the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Southern
Nevada or the Gift Account for the Veterans Home in Northern
Nevada pursuant to NRS 371.1035 must be filed annually at any
time on or before the date when payment of the tax is due. All
exemptions provided for in this section must not be in an amount
which gives the taxpayer a total exemption greater than that to
which the taxpayer is entitled during any fiscal year.
Sec. 3. NRS 371.106 is hereby amended to read as follows:
371.106 1. Whenever any vehicle ceases to be exempt from
taxation under NRS 371.101, 371.102, 371.103 or 371.104 or
section 1 of this act because the owner no longer meets the
requirements for the exemption provided in those sections, its owner
shall immediately notify the Department of the fact.
2. If a person fails to notify the Department as required by
subsection 1 and as a result of such failure is allowed a tax
exemption to which he or she is not entitled, there shall be added to
and collected with the tax otherwise due a penalty equal to double
the amount of the tax. If the person’s failure is fraudulent and results
in his or her receiving a tax exemption to which he or she is not
entitled, the person is also guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
H
-
*AB313*